en: Cable Tie Guns
xx: Cable Tie Guns
cs: Kleště na stahovací pásky
da: Kabelbinderpistoler
de: Kabelbinderpistolen
es: Pistolas para tensar y cortar bridas sujeta-cables
fr: Pinces à serre-câbles
it: Pistole per fissaggio cavi
ja: ケーブル タイ ガン
nl: Kabelbindpistolen
no: Stripspistol
pl: Pistolety do spinania kabli
pt: Amarradores de cabos
ru: Пистолеты для стяжки кабеля
sv: Buntbandspistol
tr: Kablo Kelepçesi Tabancası

en: Cable Trays
xx: Cable Trays
cs: Kabelové lávky
da: Kabelbakker
de: Kabelträger
es: Bandejas portacables
fr: Chemins de câbles
it: Vassoi per cavi
ja: ケーブルトレー
nl: Kabelgoten
no: Kabelgater
pl: Trasy kablowe
pt: Bandeja de cabos
ru: Кабельные коробы
sv: Kabelrännor
tr: Kablo Tepsileri

en: Patch Panels
xx: Patch Panels
cs: Patch panely
da: Patchpaneler
de: Schalttafeln
es: Paneles de parcheo
fr: Tableaux de connexions
it: Pannelli di permutazione
ja: パッチパネル
nl: Patchpanelen
no: Patch-paneler
pl: Krosownice
pt: Painel de conexões
ru: Коммутационные  панели
sv: Patchpaneler
tr: Bağlantı Panoları

en: Wire & Cable Identification Markers
xx: Wire & Cable Identification Markers
cs: Značkovače kabelů a vodičů
da: Mærkater til ledninger og kabler
de: Kabelmarkierungen
es: Marcadores de identificación para hilos y cables
fr: Marquage de fils et câbles
it: Contrassegni di identificazione per cavi
ja: ワイヤーマーカー・ケーブルマーカー
nl: Draad- en kabelidentificatie
no: Merketeip og -etiketter for ledninger og kabler
pl: Markery do kabli i przewodów
pt: Identificadores de fios e cabos
ru: Идентификационные маркеры для кабелей и проводов
sv: Sladdmarkörer
tr: Tel ve Kablo İşaretleme Etiketleri

en: Wire & Cable Sleeves
xx: Wire & Cable Sleeves
cs: Rukávy na vedení kabelů
da: Afskærmning til ledninger og kabler
de: Aderhülsen & Kabelmuffen
es: Revestimientos para cables
fr: Gaines pour câbles et fils
it: Manicotti per cavi e fili
ja: ワイヤー・ケーブル用スリーブ
nl: Draad- en kabelmoffen
no: Ledning- og kabelhylser
pl: Osłonki na kable
pt: Condutas para fios e cabos
ru: Кабельные муфты
sv: Kabelstrumpor
tr: Tel ve Kablo Kılıfları

en: Wire & Cable Ties
xx: Wire & Cable Ties
cs: Pásky na kabely a šňůry
da: Strips til ledninger og kabler
de: Kabelbinder
es: Bridas sujetacables
fr: Attaches de câbles et fils
it: Laccetti per fili e cavi
ja: 結束バンド
nl: Draad- en kabelbinders
no: Kabelstrips
pl: Tryktraki do kabli
pt: Amarradores de fios e cabos
ru: Ленты для проводов и кабелей
sv: Buntband
tr: Tel ve Kablo Bağları

en: Cables
xx: Cables
cs: Kabely
da: Kabler
de: Kabel
es: Cables
fr: Câbles pour appareils électroniques
it: Cavi
ja: ケーブル
nl: Kabels
no: Kabler
pl: Kable
pt: Cabos
ru: Кабели
sv: Kablar
tr: Kablolar

en: Audio & Video Cables
xx: Audio & Video Cables
cs: Kabely pro zvuk a video
da: Lyd- og videokabler
de: Audio- & Videokabel
es: Cables de audio y vídeo
fr: Câbles audio et vidéo
it: Cavi audio e video
ja: AVケーブル
nl: Audio- en videokabels
no: Lyd- og videokabler
pl: Kable audio-wideo
pt: Cabos de áudio e vídeo
ru: Аудио- и видеокабели
sv: Ljud- och videokablar
tr: Ses ve Görüntü Kabloları

en: KVM Cables
xx: KVM Cables
cs: Kabely KVM
da: KVM-kabler
de: KVM-Kabel
es: Cables para conmutador KVM
fr: Câbles KVM
it: Cavi KVM
ja: KVMケーブル
nl: KVM-kabels
no: KVM-kabler
pl: Kable KVM
pt: Cabos KVM
ru: КВМ-кабели
sv: KVM-kablar
tr: KVM Kabloları

en: Network Cables
xx: Network Cables
cs: Síťové kabely
da: Netværkskabler
de: Netzwerkkabel
es: Cableado de red
fr: Câbles réseau
it: Cavi di rete
ja: ネットワークケーブル
nl: Netwerkkabels
no: Nettverkskabler
pl: Kable sieciowe
pt: Cabos de rede
ru: Сетевые кабели
sv: Nätverkskablar
tr: Ağ Kabloları

en: Storage & Data Transfer Cables
xx: Storage & Data Transfer Cables
cs: Kabely pro ukládání a přenos dat
da: Hukommelses- og dataoverførselskabler
de: Datenübertragungs- & Speicherkabel
es: Cables de almacenamiento y transmisión de datos
fr: Câbles de données
it: Cavi per archiviazione e trasferimento di dati
ja: ストレージ/データ転送ケーブル
nl: Opslag- en gegevensoverdrachtkabels
no: Lagrings- og dataoverføringskabler
pl: Kable do przesyłu danych
pt: Cabos para armazenamento e transferência de dados
ru: Кабели для передачи данных
sv: Lagring och dataöverföring
tr: Depolama ve Veri Aktarımı Kabloları

en: System & Power Cables
xx: System & Power Cables
cs: Systémové a napájecí kabely
da: System- og strømkabler
de: System- & Netzkabel
es: Cables de alimentación
fr: Câbles système et d'alimentation
it: Cavi sistemi e alimentazione
ja: システムケーブル・電源ケーブル
nl: Systeem- en voedingskabels
no: System- og strømkabler
pl: Kable systemowe i zasilające
pt: Cabos para eletricidade e sistemas
ru: Системные и силовые кабели
sv: System- och strömkablar
tr: Sistem ve Güç Kabloları

en: Telephone Cables
xx: Telephone Cables
cs: Telefonní kabely
da: Telefonledninger
de: Telefonkabel
es: Cables de teléfono
fr: Câbles téléphoniques
it: Cavi telefonici
ja: 電話ケーブル
nl: Telefoonkabels
no: Telefonkabler
pl: Kable telefoniczne
pt: Cabos telefônicos
ru: Телефонные кабели
sv: Telefonkablar
tr: Telefon Kabloları

en: Computer Accessories
xx: Computer Accessories
cs: Počítače – příslušenství
da: Computer – tilbehør
de: Computerzubehör
es: Accesorios informáticos
fr: Accessoires pour ordinateurs
it: Accessori per computer
ja: PC周辺機器
nl: Computeraccessoires
no: Tilbehør til datamaskiner
pl: Akcesoria komputerowe
pt: Acessórios para computadores
ru: Компьютерные принадлежности
sv: Datortillbehör
tr: Bilgisayar Aksesuarları

en: Computer Accessory Sets
xx: Computer Accessory Sets
cs: Sady příslušenství k počítačům
da: Computertilbehørssæt
de: Computerzubehör-Sets
es: Sets de accesorios para ordenadores
fr: Ensembles d'accessoires pour ordinateurs
it: Set di accessori per computer
ja: コンピュータ アクセサリー セット
nl: Accessoiresets voor computers
no: Tilbehørsett til datamaskiner
pl: Zestawy akcesoriów komputerowych
pt: Conjuntos de acessórios para computador
ru: Комплекты компьютерных принадлежностей
sv: Tillbehörspaket för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar Aksesuar Setleri

en: Computer Covers & Skins
xx: Computer Covers & Skins
cs: Obaly a pouzdra na počítače
da: Computercovers
de: Computer-Schutzhüllen
es: Fundas para ordenadores
fr: Coques et skins pour ordinateurs
it: Cover e protezioni per computer
ja: PCカバー・ケース
nl: Computertassen en -hoezen
no: Omslag og etuier til datamaskiner
pl: Pokrowce i futerały na komputery
pt: Estojos e capas para computador
ru: Чехлы и кожухи для компьютеров
sv: Datorskal och -fodral
tr: Bilgisayar Kılıfları

en: Computer Risers & Stands
xx: Computer Risers & Stands
cs: Podstavce a stojany pro počítače
da: Computerholdere og -standere
de: Computer-Monitorständer
es: Bases y elevadores para ordenadores
fr: Supports pour ordinateurs, Support pour ordinateur
it: Alzate e supporti per computer
ja: PCスタンド
nl: Computerverhogers en -standaards
no: Datamaskinholdere og -stativer
pl: Podnośniki do monitorów i stoliki na laptopy
pt: Suportes para computador
ru: Подставки для компьютеров
sv: Datorupphöjare
tr: Bilgisayar Yükselticiler ve Stantları

en: Handheld Device Accessories
xx: Handheld Device Accessories
cs: Přenosná zařízení – příslušenství
da: Håndholdt enhed – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für E-Book-Reader & Handheld-Computer
es: Accesorios para dispositivos portátiles
fr: Accessoires pour appareils mobiles
it: Accessori dispositivi portatili
ja: 携帯端末・PDA周辺機器
nl: Accessoires voor handheldapparaten
no: Tilbehør til håndholdte enheter
pl: Akcesoria do palmtopów
pt: Acessórios para dispositivos portáteis
ru: Принадлежности для карманных устройств
sv: Tillbehör till handhållna enheter
tr: Elde Taşınabilir Cihaz Aksesuarları

en: E-Book Reader Accessories
xx: E-Book Reader Accessories
cs: Čtečky elektronických knih – příslušenství
da: E-bogslæser – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für E-Book-Reader
es: Accesorios para lectores de libros electrónicos
fr: Accessoires pour liseuses
it: Accessori E-Book reader
ja: 電子書籍リーダー周辺機器
nl: Accessoires voor e-boeklezers
no: Tilbehør til e-lesebrett
pl: Akcesoria do czytników e-booków
pt: Acessórios do leitor de e-book
ru: Принадлежности для электронных книг
sv: Tillbehör till e-boksläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucu Aksesuarları

en: E-Book Reader Cases
xx: E-Book Reader Cases
cs: Pouzdra na čtečky elektronických knih
da: E-bogslæser – cover
de: E-Book-Reader-Taschen
es: Estuches para lectores de libros electrónicos
fr: Housses pour liseuses
it: Custodie E-Book reader
ja: 電子書籍リーダー用ケース
nl: Hoezen voor e-boeklezers
no: Etuier til lesebrett
pl: Futerały na czytniki e-booków
pt: Estojos para leitor de e-book
ru: Чехлы для электронных книг
sv: Fodral till e-boksläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucu Kılıfları